Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,182
Product liability action; based upon negligent or defective design, testing, or labeling; defense.

In any product liability action based upon negligent or defective design, testing, or labeling, proof establishing that such design, testing, or labeling was in conformity with the generally recognized and prevailing state of the art in the industry at the time the specific product involved in the action was first sold to any person not engaged in the business of selling such product shall be a defense. State of the art as used in this section shall be defined as the best technology reasonably available at the time.

Laws 1978, LB 665, § 4.